Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3149
Application of act to existing trusts and estates.

The Uniform Principal and Income Act applies to every trust or decedent's estate existing on September 1, 2001, except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in the act.

Laws 2001, LB 56, § 34.